Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3959
Assessment; payment; procedures.

The assessment prescribed in section 2-3958 shall be paid by producers at the time of first sale or delivery of milk for commercial use and shall be collected by the first purchaser of milk except as provided in this section. The first purchaser of milk shall remit the assessment to the board when the first purchaser of milk issues the milk payroll to producers. When milk is sold by producers to nonresident first purchasers of milk, the nonresident first purchaser of milk shall remit the assessments to the board. Producer-processors shall remit the assessments to the board. All assessments shall be remitted to the board not later than the last day of the month following the month in which the milk was commercially used, and a report shall be filed by the person responsible for remitting the assessment at the time that the assessment is remitted. The board shall make proper refunds to producers pursuant to subdivision (8)(e) of section 2-3949 at least quarterly. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning the payment, remittance, refunding, and reporting of assessments. All money collected by the board shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Dairy Industry Development Fund.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 12.